software/EmEditor/Dictionaries/en_us_ru_ru.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY '-ABCDEFGHIKLMNOPRSTUVWYZabcdefghiklmnoprstuvwyz
FLAG NUMBER

PFX 1 Y 1
PFX 1   0     re         .

PFX 2 Y 1
PFX 2   0     de          .

PFX 3 Y 1
PFX 3   0     dis         .

PFX 4 Y 1
PFX 4   0     con         .

PFX 5 Y 1
PFX 5   0     in         .

PFX 6 Y 1
PFX 6   0     pro         .

PFX 7 Y 1
PFX 7   0     un         .

REP 97
REP nt n't
REP alot a_lot
REP avengence a_vengeance
REP ninties 1990s
REP teached taught
REP rised rose
REP a ei
REP ei a
REP a ey
REP ey a
REP ai ie
REP ie ai
REP are air
REP are ear
REP are eir
REP air are
REP air ere
REP ere air
REP ere ear
REP ere eir
REP ear are
REP ear air
REP ear ere
REP eir are
REP eir ere
REP ch te
REP te ch
REP ch ti
REP ti ch
REP ch tu
REP tu ch
REP ch s
REP s ch
REP ch k
REP k ch
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP gh f
REP f gh
REP i igh
REP igh i
REP i uy
REP uy i
REP i ee
REP ee i
REP j di
REP di j
REP j gg
REP gg j
REP j ge
REP ge j
REP s ti
REP ti s
REP s ci
REP ci s
REP k cc
REP cc k
REP k qu
REP qu k
REP kw qu
REP o eau
REP eau o
REP o ew
REP ew o
REP oo ew
REP ew oo
REP ew ui
REP ui ew
REP oo ui
REP ui oo
REP ew u
REP u ew
REP oo u
REP u oo
REP u oe
REP oe u
REP u ieu
REP ieu u
REP ue ew
REP ew ue
REP uff ough
REP oo ieu
REP ieu oo
REP ier ear
REP ear ier
REP ear air
REP air ear
REP w qu
REP qu w
REP z ss
REP ss z
REP shun tion
REP shun sion
REP shun cion
REP tion ssion
REP ys ies
REP u ough

SFX 8 Y 93
SFX 8   ый   ую           ый
SFX 8   ый   ому          [^ц]ый
SFX 8   ый   ом           [^ц]ый
SFX 8   ый   ой           [^ц]ый
SFX 8   ый   ого          [^ц]ый
SFX 8   ый   ое           [^ц]ый
SFX 8   ый   ою           [^ц]ый
SFX 8   ый   ему          цый
SFX 8   ый   ем           цый
SFX 8   ый   ей           цый
SFX 8   ый   его          цый
SFX 8   ый   ее           цый
SFX 8   ый   ая           ый
SFX 8   ой   ыми          [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 8   ой   ым           [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 8   ой   ых           [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 8   ой   ые           [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 8   ой   ую           ой
SFX 8   ой   ому          ой
SFX 8   ой   ом           ой
SFX 8   ой   ого          ой
SFX 8   ой   ое           ой
SFX 8   ой   ими          [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 8   ой   им           [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 8   ой   их           [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 8   ой   ие           [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 8   ой   ая           ой
SFX 8   й    ми           ый
SFX 8   й    ми           [гхк]ий
SFX 8   й    ми           [енржшщч]ий
SFX 8   й    м            ый
SFX 8   й    м            [гхк]ий
SFX 8   й    м            [енржшщч]ий
SFX 8   й    х            ый
SFX 8   й    х            [гхк]ий
SFX 8   й    х            [енржшщч]ий
SFX 8   й    е            ый
SFX 8   й    е            [гхк]ий
SFX 8   й    е            [енржшщч]ий
SFX 8   й    ю            ой
SFX 8   ийся уюся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 8   ийся имся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 8   ийся имися        [шщ]ийся
SFX 8   ийся ихся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 8   ийся иеся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 8   ийся емуся        [шщ]ийся
SFX 8   ийся емся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 8   ийся ейся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 8   ийся егося        [шщ]ийся
SFX 8   ийся ееся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 8   ийся еюся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 8   ийся аяся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 8   ий   ую           [жшщч]ий
SFX 8   ий   ую           [гхк]ий
SFX 8   ий   яя           [ен]ий
SFX 8   ий   ому          [гхк]ий
SFX 8   ий   ом           [гхк]ий
SFX 8   ий   ой           [гхк]ий
SFX 8   ий   ого          [гхк]ий
SFX 8   ий   ое           [гхк]ий
SFX 8   ий   ою           [гхк]ий
SFX 8   ий   ему          [енржшщч]ий
SFX 8   ий   ем           [енржшщч]ий
SFX 8   ий   ей           [енжшщч]ий
SFX 8   ий   его          [енржшщч]ий
SFX 8   ий   ее           [енжшщч]ий
SFX 8   ий   ею           [енжшщч]ий
SFX 8   ий   ая           [жшщч]ий
SFX 8   ий   ая           [гхк]ий
SFX 8   ий   юю           [ен]ий
SFX 8   е    ми           [иы]е
SFX 8   е    м            [иы]е
SFX 8   е    х            [иы]е
SFX 8   0    ыми          в
SFX 8   0    ыми          ин
SFX 8   0    ым           в
SFX 8   0    ым           ин
SFX 8   0    ых           в
SFX 8   0    ых           ин
SFX 8   0    ы            в
SFX 8   0    ы            ин
SFX 8   0    у            в
SFX 8   0    у            ин
SFX 8   0    ому          ин
SFX 8   0    ом           в
SFX 8   0    ом           ин
SFX 8   0    ой           в
SFX 8   0    ой           ин
SFX 8   0    ого          ин
SFX 8   0    о            в
SFX 8   0    о            ин
SFX 8   0    а            в
SFX 8   0    а            ин

SFX 9 Y 3
SFX 9   0     able       [^aeiou]
SFX 9   0     able       ee
SFX 9   e     able       [^aeiou]e

SFX 10 Y 25
SFX 10   ыться ойтесь       ыться
SFX 10   ыться ойся         ыться
SFX 10   ыть  ойте         ыть
SFX 10   ыть  ой           ыть
SFX 10   ь    е            ить
SFX 10   уться итесь        уться
SFX 10   уться ись          уться
SFX 10   уть  ите          уть
SFX 10   уть  и            уть
SFX 10   ться тесь         иться
SFX 10   ться сь           иться
SFX 10   ться йтесь        [аея]ться
SFX 10   ться йся          [аея]ться
SFX 10   ть   йте          [аея]ть
SFX 10   ть   й            [аея]ть
SFX 10   сь   тесь         ись
SFX 10   ся   тесь         йся
SFX 10   ся   тесь         [^т]ься
SFX 10   оться итесь        оться
SFX 10   оться ись          оться
SFX 10   оть  ите          оть
SFX 10   оть  и            оть
SFX 10   ить  и            ить
SFX 10   0    те           [ий]
SFX 10   0    те           [^ст]ь

SFX 11 Y 4
SFX 11   0     d          e
SFX 11   y     ied        [^aeiou]y
SFX 11   0     ed         [^ey]
SFX 11   0     ed         [aeiou]y

SFX 12 Y 5
SFX 12   ься  ся           иться
SFX 12   ться ется         [ая]ться
SFX 12   ться ются         [ая]ться
SFX 12   иться ятся         [^жшщч]иться
SFX 12   иться атся         [жшщч]иться

SFX 13 Y 15
SFX 13   ый   ей           ый
SFX 13   ый   ее           ый
SFX 13   ь    я            ь
SFX 13   ь    ем           ь
SFX 13   ь    е            ь
SFX 13   ь    ю            ь
SFX 13   ь    ём           ь
SFX 13   я    и            я
SFX 13   я    ей           я
SFX 13   я    ею           я
SFX 13   я    е            [^и]я
SFX 13   я    ю            я
SFX 13   я    ёй           я
SFX 13   я    ёю           я
SFX 13   е    й            ее

SFX 14 Y 25
SFX 14   ь    и            ь
SFX 14   онок атами        онок
SFX 14   онок атам         онок
SFX 14   онок атах         онок
SFX 14   онок ата          онок
SFX 14   онок ат           онок
SFX 14   ок   ку           нок
SFX 14   ок   ком          нок
SFX 14   ок   ке           нок
SFX 14   ок   ка           нок
SFX 14   енок ятами        енок
SFX 14   енок ятам         енок
SFX 14   енок ятах         енок
SFX 14   енок ята          енок
SFX 14   енок ят           енок
SFX 14   ая   ую           ая
SFX 14   ая   ой           ая
SFX 14   а    у            а
SFX 14   а    ой           а
SFX 14   ёнок ятами        ёнок
SFX 14   ёнок ятам         ёнок
SFX 14   ёнок ятах         ёнок
SFX 14   ёнок ята          ёнок
SFX 14   ёнок ят           ёнок
SFX 14   0    ю            ь

SFX 15 Y 2
SFX 15   e     ing        e
SFX 15   0     ing        [^e]

SFX 16 Y 52
SFX 16   ый   ому          ый
SFX 16   ый   ом           ый
SFX 16   ый   ого          ый
SFX 16   ьня  ен           ьня
SFX 16   ь    ями          ь
SFX 16   ь    ям           ь
SFX 16   ь    ях           ь
SFX 16   ь    я            ь
SFX 16   ь    и            ь
SFX 16   ь    ем           ь
SFX 16   ь    ей           ь
SFX 16   ь    е            ь
SFX 16   ь    ю            ь
SFX 16   ь    ём           ь
SFX 16   я    ь            [аеиоуы]ня
SFX 16   я    й            [еиу]я
SFX 16   я    и            я
SFX 16   я    ей           я
SFX 16   я    ею           я
SFX 16   я    е            [^и]я
SFX 16   я    ю            я
SFX 16   я    ёй           я
SFX 16   я    ёю           я
SFX 16   ок   ку           ок
SFX 16   ок   ком          ок
SFX 16   ок   ке           ок
SFX 16   ок   ка           ок
SFX 16   ой   им           ой
SFX 16   ня   ен           [^аеийоуьыз]ня
SFX 16   йня  ен           йня
SFX 16   й    му           ой
SFX 16   й    м            ый
SFX 16   й    м            ой
SFX 16   й    м            ий
SFX 16   й    го           ой
SFX 16   ий   ому          ий
SFX 16   ий   ом           ий
SFX 16   ий   ого          ий
SFX 16   ек   ку           ек
SFX 16   ек   ком          ек
SFX 16   ек   ке           ек
SFX 16   ек   ка           ек
SFX 16   ец   цу           ец
SFX 16   ец   це           ец
SFX 16   ец   ца           ец
SFX 16   0    ым           [^цейкояжьшщч]
SFX 16   0    у            [^цейкояь]
SFX 16   0    ми           я
SFX 16   0    м            я
SFX 16   0    х            я
SFX 16   0    е            [^цейкояь]
SFX 16   0    а            [^цейкояь]

SFX 17 N 2
SFX 17   y     ieth       y
SFX 17   0     th         [^y]

SFX 18 Y 14
SFX 18   я    и            я
SFX 18   я    ей           я
SFX 18   я    ею           я
SFX 18   я    е            [^и]я
SFX 18   я    ю            я
SFX 18   й    ю            [ео]й
SFX 18   а    ы            [^гхкжшщч]а
SFX 18   а    у            а
SFX 18   а    ой           [^цжшщч]а
SFX 18   а    ою           [^цжшщч]а
SFX 18   а    и            [гхкжшщч]а
SFX 18   а    ей           ща
SFX 18   а    ею           ща
SFX 18   а    е            а

SFX 19 Y 30
SFX 19   ьня  ен           ьня
SFX 19   ька  ек           ька
SFX 19   я    ь            [аеиояуы]ня
SFX 19   я    й            [еиу]я
SFX 19   я    и            я
SFX 19   я    ей           я
SFX 19   я    ею           я
SFX 19   я    е            [^и]я
SFX 19   я    ю            я
SFX 19   ня   ен           [^аеийояуьыз]ня
SFX 19   ка   ок           [^юацеийояужьышч]ка
SFX 19   ка   к            [юаеиояуы]ка
SFX 19   ка   ек           [цжшч]ка
SFX 19   йня  ен           йня
SFX 19   йка  ек           йка
SFX 19   а    ы            [^гхкжшщч]а
SFX 19   а    у            а
SFX 19   а    ой           [^цжшщч]а
SFX 19   а    ою           [^цжшщч]а
SFX 19   а    и            [гхкжшщч]а
SFX 19   а    ей           [цшщч]а
SFX 19   а    ею           [цшщч]а
SFX 19   а    е            а
SFX 19   а    0            [^к]а
SFX 19   0    ми           я
SFX 19   0    ми           а
SFX 19   0    м            я
SFX 19   0    м            а
SFX 19   0    х            я
SFX 19   0    х            а

SFX 20 Y 2
SFX 20   e     ings       e
SFX 20   0     ings       [^e]

SFX 21 Y 37
SFX 21   ь    я            ь
SFX 21   ь    ем           ь
SFX 21   ь    е            ь
SFX 21   ь    ю            ь
SFX 21   о    у            о
SFX 21   о    е            о
SFX 21   о    а            о
SFX 21   й    я            й
SFX 21   й    и            ий
SFX 21   й    ем           й
SFX 21   й    е            [^и]й
SFX 21   й    ю            й
SFX 21   е    у            [цжшщ]е
SFX 21   е    я            [^цжшщ]е
SFX 21   е    и            ие
SFX 21   е    а            [цжшщ]е
SFX 21   е    ю            [^цжшщ]е
SFX 21   ёж   ежу          ёж
SFX 21   ёж   еже          ёж
SFX 21   ёж   ежа          ёж
SFX 21   ё    я            ё
SFX 21   ё    е            ьё
SFX 21   ё    ю            ё
SFX 21   0    у            [^ейоь]
SFX 21   0    у            [^ёейожь]
SFX 21   0    у            [^ё]ж
SFX 21   0    ом           [^цейожьшщч]
SFX 21   0    ом           [^ёцейожьшщч]
SFX 21   0    м            о
SFX 21   0    м            е
SFX 21   0    м            [ёе]
SFX 21   0    е            [^ейоь]
SFX 21   0    е            [^ёейожь]
SFX 21   0    е            [^ё]ж
SFX 21   0    а            [^ейоь]
SFX 21   0    а            [^ёейожь]
SFX 21   0    а            [^ё]ж
